Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2018.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) Neither the secretary of state nor any No county
election officer shall disqualify an individual from serving as a poll worker
at any election on the basis of residency or registered voter status if such
individual is a citizen of the United States and an active military member
or the spouse or other dependent of an active military member.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or otherwise
restrict any poll worker qualifications based on the age of the individual,
except as provided in K.S.A. 25-2804, and amendments thereto.
(c) "Active military member" means any person with full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
national guard and reserve.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 25-2804 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
2804. (a) Each person recommended as provided in K.S.A. 25-2803(a),
and amendments thereto, shall be a resident of the area served by the
voting place in which such person is to be a judge or clerk citizen of the
United States and live within the state of Kansas.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, All judges and
clerks shall have the qualifications of an elector in the election at which
they serve, and be a citizen of the United States and live within the state of
Kansas. No judge or clerk shall be a candidate for any office, other
than the office of precinct committeeman or precinct
committeewoman, to be elected at such election. The county election
officer may appoint persons who are at least 16 years of age to serve as
election judges or clerks if such persons meet all other requirements
for qualification of an elector and have a letter of recommendation from
a school teacher, counselor or administrator. No more than 1/ of the

persons appointed to each election board may be under the age of 18.

HB 2018—Am. by HC 2
(c) The county election officer may establish a pool of trained
judges and clerks who shall be recommended by the county
chairpersons specified in K.S.A. 25-2803(a), and amendments thereto.
Judges and clerks in such pool may serve at voting places other than
their own if:
(1) The chairpersons specified in K.S.A. 25-2803(a), and
amendments thereto, or either of them, have failed to make
appropriate recommendations;
(2) it is impossible to obtain judges and clerks for a voting place
in any other way; or
(3) voting machines are used, in which case the third judge, who
shall be trained in the use of voting machines, need not necessarily live
in the area of the voting place.
(d) Any judge or clerk serving in a voting place not located in the
area in which such judge or clerk resides or serving on a special
election board established under K.S.A. 25-1133(c), and amendments
thereto, shall be allowed to vote an advance voting ballot in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 25-1119, and amendments
thereto, or shall be excused from duties as such judge or clerk to vote
at the voting place in the area where such judge or clerk resides.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 25-2804 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 2. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.